Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2332.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Warehouse Worker Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adverse employment action." Discrimination, dismissal, discipline, discharge or any other decision adverse to the employee."Aggregated data." Data, information and statistics compiled by an employer that is analyzed to measure employees' performance and that cannot be identified with any individual 123456789101112131415161718 employee."Authorized employee representative." An employee authorized by employees or the designated representative of a labor organization that has a collective bargaining relationship with the cited employer and that represents affected employees who are members of the collective bargaining agreement."Defined time period." Any unit of time measure equal to or less than the duration of an employee's shift and includes hours, minutes, seconds and any fraction thereof."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employee." An individual who works at a warehouse distribution center that is subject to a quota."Employer." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 103 of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act."Monetary damages." Financial compensation awarded to a party that suffered a loss or injury as a result of the other party's actions."Person." An individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability corporation, business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, agency, instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity, whether domestic or foreign."Personal work speed data." As follows:(1) Data, information and statistics collected, stored, analyzed or interpreted by an employer relating to an employee's performance of a quota, including quantities of tasks performed, quantities of items or materials handled or produced, rates or speed of tasks performed, measurements or 20260HB2332PN3106 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 metrics of employee performance in relation to a quota, and time categorized as performing and not performing tasks to meet a quota.(2) The term does not include personnel records, itemized wage statements or qualitative performance assessments."Quota." A standard in which an employee is assigned or required to perform at a specific speed of production, complete a quantifiable number of tasks or handle or produce a quantifiable number of materials within a defined time period and under which the employee may receive adverse employment action for failure to meet the standards, whether an employee's:(1) actions are categorized and measured between time performing tasks and not performing tasks within an assigned work shift; or(2) performance is ranked in relation to the performance of other employees."Warehouse distribution center." An entity with at least 100 employees which is engaged in activities defined by the North American Industry Classification System under the following codes:(1) 423 Merchant Wholesalers, Durable Goods.(2) 424 Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods.(3) 492110 Couriers and Express Delivery Services.(4) 493 Warehousing and Storage."Work speed data." Information and statistics collected, stored, analyzed or interpreted by employers regarding an individual employee's performance, including metrics such as quantities of tasks performed, quantities of items or materials handled or produced, rates or speeds of tasks performed or 20260HB2332PN3106 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 completed, measurements or metrics of employee performance in relation to a quota productivity goal or comparison to other employees, and time categorized as performing tasks or not performing tasks.Section 3. Notification of quotas.Employees shall be notified of employee quotas in accordance with the following:(1) An employer shall provide to each employee, upon hire or within 30 days of the effective date of this paragraph, written and verbal notification of:(i) Each quota that the employee is required to comply with, including the quantified number of tasks to be performed or materials to be handled or produced in a defined time period.(ii) Potential adverse employment actions that could result from failure to meet each quota.(iii) Incentives or bonus programs associated with meeting or exceeding each quota.(2) Updates to quotas that the employee is required to comply with shall be provided by the employer to the employee through written and verbal notice within five full business days prior to enforcement of the quota.(3) Written notices of quotas shall be in a language that the employee speaks.Section 4. Prohibitions.(a) Adverse employment actions.--An employer may not take adverse employment action against an employee for failure to comply with a quota if the employer fails to provide adequate notice of the quota as required under section 3.(b) Quotas.--An employee shall not be required to meet a 20260HB2332PN3106 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 quota that:(1) Has not been previously disclosed.(2) Prevents compliance with any meal or rest period, whether provided by the employer or mandated by law.(3) Prevents necessary use of bathroom facilities, including adequate time to travel to and from bathroom facilities.(4) Prevents an employee from taking breaks of 20 minutes or less for employees who work less than five hours.(5) Measures total output over an increment of time that is shorter than one day.(6) Ranks employees in relation to the performance of other employees.(7) Prohibits an employee from complying with Federal or State laws or regulations relating to occupational safety standards.(c) Time periods.--A time period considered in a quota, including time designated as productive time or time on a task, shall include:(1) Time for rest breaks and reasonable time to travel to designated locations for rest breaks.(2) Time for meal breaks and reasonable time to travel to on-site designated meal break locations. Meal breaks shall be considered time on task or productive time if the employee is required by the employer to remain on duty on the premises, at a prescribed worksite in the interest of the employer or if the employee is required to remain on call.(3) Time to use bathroom facilities, including reasonable time to travel to and from bathroom facilities.(4) Time to perform an activity required by the employer 20260HB2332PN3106 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that is subject to a quota.(5) Time to take any actions necessary for the employee to exercise the employee's right to a safe workplace under law, including access to tools or safety equipment necessary to perform the employee's duties.Section 5. Employer records.(a) Creation.--If an employer has quotas, the employer shall create and maintain records of the following:(1) Each employee's personal work speed data.(2) The aggregated work speed data for employees in the same position at the same warehouse distribution center.(3) The written and electronic notification provided for each quota to which the employee is required to comply.(4) Actions taken by the employer for the employee's failure to meet a quota.(b) Time period.--An employer shall retain employees' records for four years from the date the records were created.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an employer to collect or maintain records if the employer does not utilize quotas or monitor an employee's personal work speed data.Section 6. Request for records.(a) By employee.--At any time, an employee or authorized employee representative of an employee may request a written and electronic copy of:(1) A quota with which an employee is required to comply.(2) The employee's own personal work speed data.(3) A copy of the prior six months of aggregated data for employees in the same role or a role with a similar job 20260HB2332PN3106 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 description at the same warehouse distribution center.(b) By separated employee.--Within three years of a separation from an employer, a separated employee may request the following information:(1) Written and electronic copies of each quota with which an employee was required to comply.(2) The employee's own personal work speed data.(3) The prior six months of aggregated data for employees in the same role or a role with a similar job description at the same warehouse distribution center.(c) Time period.--(1) An employer shall provide written and electronic notification of quotas within five full business days of the request by an employee or former employee.(2) An employer shall provide personal work speed data and aggregated data within seven business days of the request.(d) Costs.--An employer may not charge a fee to provide records requested under this section.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an employer to use quotas or monitor work speed data. If an employer does not monitor work speed data, the employer is not required to provide records under this section.Section 7. Prohibition against adverse employment action.(a) General prohibition.--An employer, an agent or a person acting as or on behalf of a hiring entity, or the officer or agent of any entity, business, corporation, partnership or limited liability company, may not take an adverse employment action against an employee for:(1) Failure to meet a quota prohibited by this act.20260HB2332PN3106 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Requesting data as identified under section 6.(3) Reporting violations of this act, Federal or State law, standards or regulations or any action protected by the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law.(b) Rebuttable presumption.--There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the adverse employment action is retaliatory if an employer takes adverse employment action against an employee or former employee within 90 days of the employee engaging or attempting to engage in activities protected under this act, unless:(1) The action was taken for other permissible reasons.(2) The engagement or attempt to engage in activities protected by this act was not a motivating factor in the adverse employment action.Section 8. Procedures for complaints.(a) Complaint form.--The department shall develop and post a complaint form on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(b) Complaint process.--An employee or former employee may report failure to comply with this act to the department on the complaint form developed under subsection (a).Section 9. Procedures for investigations.(a) Duty to investigate.--After a complaint under section 8 is filed, the department shall investigate the alleged violation and conduct within a three-year period prior to the violation. Within 120 days after the complaint was received, the department shall issue a notice of violation to the employer.(b) Investigation.--When conducting an investigation, the department may:20260HB2332PN3106 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Consolidate complaints as deemed appropriate by the department.(2) Enter and inspect the warehouse distribution center.(3) Request or subpoena records as the department may deem appropriate or necessary.(4) Interrogate employees for the purposes of determining whether an employer is in compliance with this this act.(c) Notification to employees.--An employer shall provide written and electronic notification to employees that the department is conducting an investigation.Section 10. Penalties.Penalties shall be imposed in accordance with the following:(1) Following an investigation, a person found in violation of this act shall be subject to an administrative penalty of 10 times the monetary damages with a maximum penalty of $10,000 per employee.(2) Penalties collected under this section shall be appropriated to the department for the purposes of enforcement of this act.(3) Penalties imposed under this section are subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5. Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 11. Private right of action.An employee or former employee who suffers adverse employment action in violation of this act may commence a private right of action against an employer to recover damages, costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred.Section 12. Powers and duties.20260HB2332PN3106 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Department.--The department may promulgate and enforce regulations consistent with this act.(b) Attorney General.--The Office of Attorney General may prosecute civil or criminal actions under this act.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2332PN3106 - 10 - 123456